Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5480.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1310f. (1) If a parent or legal guardian requests to transfer their child to a school district in which the child is not a resident, the board of the receiving school district must accept the transfer if the parent or legal guardian provides the receiving school district with evidence of all of the following: (a) That the child is suffering from bullying in the child's current school district. (b) That the child or the child's parent or legal guardian has reported the bullying to appropriate school personnel, including documented incidents of bullying. (c) That the child's current school attempted to intervene, and the intervention failed to fix the bullying issues. (2) The board of a school district may not reject a child's transfer under subsection (1) because the child has been habitually truant in the child's current school district. (3) If a school district accepts a child's transfer under subsection (1), the child's current school district shall provide the receiving school district with that child's academic records not less than 7 days after receiving notice of the child's transfer. (4) The board of a school district, governing body of a public school, or any individual responsible for facilitating a transfer under this section that fails to comply with this section is liable in a cause of action for damages arising out of failure to transfer a child as required under this section. (5) As used in this section, "bullying" means that term as defined in section 1310b. (6) This section shall be known as the "Natalia Moore Law". Sec. 1401. (1) The Subject to subsection (6), the board of a school district may admit nonresident pupils to the schools of the district. The board shall determine the rates of tuition of the nonresident pupils and shall collect the tuition. (2) Tuition for grades K to 6 shall must not exceed 25% more than the operation cost per capita for the number of pupils in membership in grades K to 12. (3) Tuition for grades 7 to 12 shall must not exceed 12-1/2% more than 115% of the operation cost per capita for the number of pupils in membership in grades K to 12. (4) In a school district not maintaining grades above the eighth grade, the tuition shall must not exceed 25% more than the operation cost per capita for the number of pupils in membership in grades K to 8. (5) The operation costs and membership figures of the preceding fiscal year shall must be used. The per capita cost used shall must not include moneys expended for school sites, school building construction, equipment, payment of bonds, or other purposes not properly included in operation costs as determined by the state board. (6) The board of a school district shall not charge tuition to a nonresident pupil who transfers to the school district under section 1310f.